Maine, session 132, LD1257.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA c. 101, sub-c. 7, headnote is amended to read:
SUBCHAPTER 7
LABELING FOODS FREE OF FOR GENETIC ENGINEERING
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §530-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 452, Pt. B, §5 and affected by
Pt. X, §2, is further amended by amending the section headnote to read:
§530-A. Voluntary labeling; foods free of genetic engineering
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §530-B is enacted to read:
§530-B. Labels required for food or food products that are genetically engineered
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Aquaculture" has the same meaning as in Title 12, section 6001, subsection 1.
B. "Food or food products" has the same meaning as in section 282, subsection 2.
C. "Genetically engineered" has the same meaning as in section 1051, subsection 2.
D. "Livestock" has the same meaning as in section 81, subsection 8.
E. "Poultry" has the same meaning as in section 1751, subsection 5.
2. Labeling required. A label must be placed on a food or food product offered for
sale in the State derived from aquaculture, livestock or poultry that is genetically
engineered. The label must:
A. Contain a clear and concise statement that the food or food product is genetically
engineered; and
B. Be conspicuously and prominently placed in order to be easily seen by a consumer.
3. Enforcement; rules. If inspection personnel of the department find that a food or
food product is not properly labeled as required by this section, the commissioner shall
issue a stop order for the food or food product until it is labeled in accordance with this
section.
The department shall adopt rules implementing this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this
subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.